Florida, session 2026, SB182.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 53 54 Section 1.âParagraph (e) of subsection (10) of section 55 1002.33, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 56 1002.33âCharter schools.â 57 (10)âELIGIBLE STUDENTS.â 58 (e)âA charter school may limit the enrollment process only 59 to target the following student populations: 60 1.âStudents within specific age groups or grade levels. 61 2.âStudents considered at risk of dropping out of school or 62 academic failure. Such students shall include exceptional 63 education students. 64 3.âStudents enrolling in a charter school-in-the-workplace 65 or charter school-in-a-municipality established pursuant to 66 subsection (15). 67 4.âStudents residing within a reasonable distance of the 68 charter school, as described in paragraph (20)(c). Such students 69 shall be subject to a random lottery and to the racial/ethnic 70 balance provisions described in subparagraph (7)(a)8. or any 71 federal provisions that require a school to achieve a 72 racial/ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves or 73 within the racial/ethnic range of other nearby public schools. 74 5.âStudents who meet reasonable academic, artistic, or 75 other eligibility standards established by the charter school 76 and included in the charter school application and charter or, 77 in the case of existing charter schools, standards that are 78 consistent with the schoolâs mission and purpose. Such standards 79 shall be in accordance with current state law and practice in 80 public schools and may not discriminate against otherwise 81 qualified individuals. A school that limits enrollment for such 82 purposes must place a student on a progress monitoring plan for 83 at least one semester before dismissing such student from the 84 school. A student may not be dismissed based on academic 85 performance while a school is implementing a school improvement 86 plan pursuant to paragraph (9)(n) or corrective action plan 87 pursuant to s. 1002.345. 88 6.âStudents articulating from one charter school to another 89 pursuant to an articulation agreement between the charter 90 schools that has been approved by the sponsor. 91 7.âStudents living in a development, or students whose 92 parent or legal guardian maintains a physical or permanent 93 employment presence within the development, in which a 94 developer, including any affiliated business entity or 95 charitable foundation, contributes to the formation, 96 acquisition, construction, or operation of one or more charter 97 schools or charter school facilities and related property in an 98 amount equal to or having a total appraised value of at least $5 99 million to be used as charter schools to mitigate the 100 educational impact created by the development of new residential 101 dwelling units. Students living in the development are entitled 102 to 50 percent of the student stations in the charter schools. 103 The students who are eligible for enrollment are subject to a 104 random lottery, the racial/ethnic balance provisions, or any 105 federal provisions, as described in subparagraph 4. The 106 remainder of the student stations must be filled in accordance 107 with subparagraph 4. 108 8.âStudents whose parent or legal guardian is employed 109 within a reasonable distance of the charter school, as described 110 in paragraph (20)(c). The students who are eligible for 111 enrollment are subject to a random lottery. 112 Section 2.âParagraphs (g) and (h) of subsection (11) of 113 section 1002.395, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 114 1002.395âFlorida Tax Credit Scholarship Program.â 115 (11)âSCHOLARSHIP AMOUNT AND PAYMENT.â 116 (g)âReimbursements for program expenditures may continue 117 until the account balance is expended or the scholarship account 118 is closed remaining funds have reverted to the state. 119 (h)1.âA studentâs scholarship account must be closed and 120 any remaining funds must shall revert to the organization state 121 after: 122 a.1.âDenial or revocation of program eligibility by the 123 commissioner for fraud or abuse, including, but not limited to, 124 the student or studentâs parent accepting any payment, refund, 125 or rebate, in any manner, from a provider of any services 126 received pursuant to paragraph (6)(d); 127 b.2.âTwo consecutive fiscal years in which an account has 128 been inactive; or 129 c.3.âThe student remains unenrolled in an eligible private 130 school for 30 days while receiving a scholarship that requires 131 full-time enrollment. 132 2.âAll funds that revert to the organization must be 133 separately accounted for and used to fund scholarships in the 134 fiscal year the reversion occurs. Any funds remaining at the end 135 of the fiscal year may be carried forward to the following 136 fiscal year and must be fully expended for annual or partial 137 year scholarships in the following fiscal year. 138 3.âBy July 1 of each year, an organization must report to 139 the Department of Education the total number of scholarship 140 accounts that were closed during the prior fiscal year and the 141 amount of funds that reverted to the organization. 142 Section 3.âSubsection (19) of section 1002.42, Florida 143 Statutes, is amended to read: 144 1002.42âPrivate schools.â 145 (19)âFACILITIES AND LAND USE.â 146 (a)âA private school may use facilities on property owned 147 or leased by a library, community service organization, museum, 148 performing arts venue, theater, cinema, or church facility under 149 s. 170.201, which is or was actively used as such within 5 years 150 of any executed agreement with a private school to use the 151 facilities; any facility or land owned by a Florida College 152 System institution or university; any similar public 153 institutional facilities; and any facility recently used to 154 house a school or child care facility licensed under s. 402.305, 155 under any such facilityâs preexisting zoning and land use 156 designations without rezoning or obtaining a special exception 157 or a land use change, and without complying with any mitigation 158 requirements or conditions. The facility must be located on 159 property used solely for purposes described in this paragraph, 160 and must meet applicable state and local health, safety, and 161 welfare laws, codes, and rules, including firesafety and 162 building safety. 163 (b)âA private school may use facilities on property 164 purchased from a library, community service organization, 165 museum, performing arts venue, theater, cinema, or church 166 facility under s. 170.201, which is actively or was actively 167 used as such within 5 years of any executed agreement with a 168 private school to purchase the facilities; any facility or land 169 owned by a Florida College System institution or university; any 170 similar public institutional facilities; and any facility 171 recently used to house a school or child care facility licensed 172 under s. 402.305, under any such facilityâs preexisting zoning 173 and land use designations without obtaining a special exception, 174 rezoning, or a land use change, and without complying with any 175 mitigation requirements or conditions. The facility must be 176 located on property used solely for purposes described in this 177 paragraph, and must meet applicable state and local health, 178 safety, and welfare laws, codes, and rules, including firesafety 179 and building safety. 180 (c)âA private school located in a county with four 181 incorporated municipalities may construct new facilities, which 182 may be temporary or permanent, on property purchased from or 183 owned or leased by a library, community service organization, 184 museum, performing arts venue, theater, cinema, or church under 185 s. 170.201, which is or was actively used as such within 5 years 186 of any executed agreement with a private school; any land owned 187 by a Florida College System institution or state university; and 188 any land recently used to house a school or child care facility 189 licensed under s. 402.305, under its preexisting zoning and land 190 use designations without rezoning or obtaining a special 191 exception or a land use change, and without complying with any 192 mitigation requirements or conditions. Any new facility must be 193 located on property used solely for purposes described in this 194 paragraph, and must meet applicable state and local health, 195 safety, and welfare laws, codes, and rules, including firesafety 196 and building safety. 197 (d)âA private school enrolling 150 or fewer students, or 198 located within the unincorporated area of a county as defined in 199 s. 125.011, shall be considered a permitted use and occupancy in 200 a commercial or mixed-use zoning district within a county or 201 municipality without rezoning or obtaining a special exception 202 or a land use change, and without complying with any mitigation 203 requirements, conditions, performance standards, ordinances, 204 rules, codes, or policies, except that a county or municipality 205 may require proportionate mitigation measures necessary to 206 mitigate vehicular traffic and pedestrian safety. 207 1.âThe vehicular traffic and pedestrian safety mitigation 208 measures required by a county or municipality pursuant to this 209 subsection shall be limited to those impacts reasonably and 210 directly attributable to the operation of the private school at 211 the site and shall be no greater in cost or scope than what is 212 required of all other uses, education or otherwise, within the 213 same zoning district. 214 2.âThe private school subject to vehicular traffic and 215 pedestrian safety mitigation measures may, in lieu of complying 216 with such mitigation measures, provide a traffic study that 217 demonstrates the school will not have disproportionate impact on 218 vehicular traffic or pedestrian safety compared to other 219 allowable uses within the same zoning district. 220 (e)âNotwithstanding any other provision of law, a private 221 school enrolling 150 or fewer students may operate in a facility 222 that is an existing assembly, day care, mercantile, or business 223 occupancy, as defined in the Florida Fire Prevention Code. A 224 private school operating in such a facility must meet the 225 standards for existing educational occupancy requirements under 226 the Florida Fire Prevention Code, adopted by the State Fire 227 Marshal. Completion of the fire safety evaluation system for 228 educational occupancies in the National Fire Protection 229 Association, Life Safety Code, NFPA 101A: Guide on Alternative 230 Approaches to Life Safety, adopted by the State Fire Marshal, by 231 a registered design professional licensed under chapter 471 or 232 chapter 481, with a determination of achieving at a minimum an 233 âat least equivalentâ conclusion, is considered evidence of 234 compliance with the Florida Fire Prevention Code. The State Fire 235 Marshal may adopt rules to implement this paragraph. 236 Section 4.âParagraph (w) is added to subsection (2) of 237 section 1003.42, Florida Statutes, to read: 238 1003.42âRequired instruction.â 239 (2)âMembers of the instructional staff of the public 240 schools, subject to the rules of the State Board of Education 241 and the district school board, shall teach efficiently and 242 faithfully, using the books and materials required that meet the 243 highest standards for professionalism and historical accuracy, 244 following the prescribed courses of study, and employing 245 approved methods of instruction, the following: 246 (w)1.âFor students in grades 3 through 5, the study of 247 cursive writing and the development of the skills necessary for 248 legible cursive writing, including: 249 a.âLetter formation. 250 b.âProper spacing and alignment. 251 c.âPractice in writing complete words and sentences in 252 cursive. 253 2.âBy the end of grade 5, each student must demonstrate 254 proficiency in cursive writing. For purposes of this 255 subparagraph, the term âproficiency in cursive writingâ means 256 all of the following: 257 a.âThe ability to write uppercase and lowercase letters of 258 the alphabet in cursive writing. 259 b.âWriting words and sentences in cursive legibly and 260 maintaining proper spacing and alignment. 261 c.âThe ability to read and apply cursive writing in a 262 manner that supports literacy development, including writing 263 essays and assignments in cursive writing in accordance with 264 state academic standards. 265 266 The State Board of Education is encouraged to adopt standards 267 and pursue assessment of the requirements of this subsection. 268 Instructional programming that incorporates the values of the 269 recipients of the Congressional Medal of Honor and that is 270 offered as part of a social studies, English Language Arts, or 271 other schoolwide character building and veteran awareness 272 initiative meets the requirements of paragraph (u). 273 Section 5.âSubsection (4) of section 1003.44, Florida 274 Statutes, is amended to read: 275 1003.44âPatriotic programs; rules.â 276 (4)âEach district school board shall adopt rules to 277 require:, in all of the schools of the district and in each 278 building used by the district school board, 279 (a)âThe display of the state motto, âIn God We Trust,â 280 designated under s. 15.0301, in a conspicuous place at each 281 public school in the district and in each building used by the 282 district school board. 283 (b)âSubject to legislative appropriation, the display of 284 portraits of George Washington and Abraham Lincoln in a 285 conspicuous place at each public school in the district. The 286 Department of Education shall select the portraits and make them 287 available to each school district. 288 Section 6.âSection 1012.988, Florida Statutes, is created 289 to read: 290 1012.988âSchool Teacher Training and Mentoring Program.â 291 (1)âThe School Teacher Training and Mentoring Program is 292 established within the Department of Education. The purpose of 293 the program is to increase the effectiveness and involvement of 294 classroom teachers and improve student achievement, classroom 295 management, and excellence in the stateâs public schools. 296 (2)(a)âSchool districts and charter schools may place 297 retired classroom teachers or current classroom teachers in 298 schools earning a grade of âDâ or âFâ to act as teacher mentors 299 to: 300 1.âNew classroom teachers; 301 2.âClassroom teachers who are rated as needs improvement, 302 developing, or unsatisfactory on the prior yearâs performance 303 evaluation under s. 1012.34; or 304 3.âClassroom teachers identified by the school 305 administrator as struggling with behavior management within the 306 classroom. 307 (b)âEach teacher mentor selected by the school district, 308 charter school, or charter management organization must have: 309 1.âAt least 3 years of teaching experience in 310 prekindergarten through grade 12. 311 2.âEarned a highly effective rating on his or her most 312 recent performance evaluation under s. 1012.34. 313 (c)âEach teacher mentor may receive a stipend of up to 314 $3,000. 315 (d)âEach mentor and mentee relationship through the program 316 shall be for one grading period. 317 (e)1.âA retired classroom teacher serving as a teacher 318 mentor may not have more than five mentees at a time. 319 2.âA classroom teacher serving as a teacher mentor may not 320 have more than one mentee at a time. 321 (3)âThe Department of Education shall establish program 322 standards and a standard contract template for the teacher 323 mentor and mentee which outlines the responsibilities of each 324 person and establishes the framework and goals of the program. 325 (4)âEach teacher mentor must: 326 (a)âPresent significant historical events with accuracy and 327 integrity, grounded in verifiable evidence and scholarly rigor. 328 (b)âIf a curriculum is used, use a curriculum that affirms 329 the principles of fairness and equal opportunity reflected in 330 the Florida Educational Equity Act and encourages respectful 331 dialogue across diverse perspectives. 332 (c)âMaintain confidentiality, unless prohibited by law. 333 (d)âNot have a personal agenda other than assisting his or 334 her mentee in developing and reaching the menteeâs goals. 335 (e)âHelp his or her mentee in developing skills and 336 expertise, including drawing upon the teacher mentorâs own 337 personal experiences. 338 (5)âThe State Board of Education may adopt rules to 339 administer this section. 340 Section 7.âParagraph (a) of subsection (7) of section 341 1011.62, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 342 1011.62âFunds for operation of schools.âIf the annual 343 allocation from the Florida Education Finance Program to each 344 district for operation of schools is not determined in the 345 annual appropriations act or the substantive bill implementing 346 the annual appropriations act, it shall be determined as 347 follows: 348 (7)âEDUCATIONAL ENRICHMENT ALLOCATION.â 349 (a)âThe educational enrichment allocation is created to 350 assist school districts in providing educational enrichment 351 activities and services that support and increase the academic 352 achievement of students in grades kindergarten through 12. 353 Educational enrichment activities and services may be provided 354 in a manner and at any time during or beyond the regular 180-day 355 term identified by the school district as being the most 356 effective and efficient way to best help the student progress 357 from grade to grade and graduate from high school. Funds from 358 the educational enrichment allocation may be used for the School 359 Teacher Training and Mentoring Program under s. 1012.988 if 360 funds are available. For fiscal year 2023-2024, the educational 361 enrichment allocation shall consist of a base amount as 362 specified in the General Appropriations Act. Beginning in fiscal 363 year 2024-2025, the educational enrichment allocation shall 364 consist of the base amount that includes a workload adjustment 365 based on changes in the unweighted full-time equivalent 366 membership. Beginning in fiscal year 2025-2026, and each year 367 thereafter, the statewide average base amount as specified in 368 the General Appropriations Act shall be used for any new 369 educational entity funded in the Florida Education Finance 370 Program. 371 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.